Tennessee, session 114, HB2007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "End the Grocery Tax Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-228(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead the following:
(a) Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in
subsection (b), the retail sale of food and food ingredients shall not be taxed.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103(c)(2), is amended by
deleting the following language:
Revenue generated from one-half percent (0.5%) of the tax rate provided in § 67-6-228
shall continue to be deposited in the state general fund and earmarked for education
purposes in kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) regardless of whether the tax rate
provided in § 67-6-228 is reduced below six percent (6%).
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103(u), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead the following:
(u) Notwithstanding the allocations provided for in subsection (a), there must be
allocated and distributed to the counties and municipalities an amount substantially
equal to the amount that would have been allocated to the counties and municipalities
under subdivision (a)(3) but for the exemption from sales tax applicable to the retail sale
of food and food ingredients. The allocation provided in this subsection (u) must be
based on the reporting of exempt sales of food and food ingredients and any other data
or information the commissioner deems relevant.
HB2007
011450
- 1 -

SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-329(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new, appropriately designated subdivision:
( ) Food and food ingredients;
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-329(a)(18), is amended by
deleting the language "or food and food ingredients".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-229, is amended by deleting the
language "food and food ingredients or".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-702(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (1)(B) and redesignating subdivision (1)(A) as subdivision (1), and by deleting the
language ", subject to subdivision (a)(1)(B),".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-705, is amended by deleting
subsection (d).
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-3-802(1), is amended by
deleting the language "that derives at least twenty percent (20%) of its sales taxable sales from
the retail sale of food and food ingredients for human consumption taxed at the rate provided in
§ 67-6-228(a)" and substituting instead the language "that derives at least twenty percent (20%)
of its sales from the retail sale of food and food ingredients for human consumption".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-3-806(d)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "must maintain a minimum of twenty percent (20%) of the licensee's sales
taxable sales from the retail sale of food and food ingredients for human consumption taxed at
the rate provided in § 67-6-228(a)" and substituting instead the language "must maintain a
minimum of twenty percent (20%) of the licensee's sales from the retail sale of food and food
ingredients for human consumption".
SECTION 12. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011450